Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7316.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 37-2 of the General Laws entitled "State Purchases" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
37-2-58.1. Review of contracted services.
(a) The director of any state agency with contracted service expenditures of more than five
million dollars ($5,000,000) shall, on an annual basis, commencing July 1, 2027, conduct a review
of all contracted services spending to identify where reductions in contracted spending can be made.
(b) Commencing in the fiscal year 2027-2028, any department that has contracted spending
of more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall provide a two percent (2%) reduction in said
expenditures within a period of five (5) fiscal years.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003621
========